Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.335

Public utility districts and municipally owned electrical utilities—Restrictions on access by law enforcement authorities.

A law enforcement authority may not request inspection or copying of records of any person who belongs to a public utility district or a municipally owned electrical utility unless the authority provides the public utility district or municipally owned electrical utility with a written statement in which the authority states that it suspects that the particular person to whom the records pertain has committed a crime and the authority has a reasonable belief that the records could determine or help determine whether the suspicion might be true. Information obtained in violation of this section is inadmissible in any criminal proceeding.

[ 2007 c 197 s 6.]